Hawaii statutes.
[§481G-8] Antitrust laws. No provision
of this chapter shall repeal, modify, or supersede, directly or indirectly, any
provision of chapter 480. [L 1983, c 285, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next